src/fst/test/gt-dict-yamls/dict-gt-yamls/V-3lex_kuikettid_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kuikettiđ: # MLO: checked
    kuikettiđ+V+Inf: kuˊikettiđ
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuˊikettâm
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kuˊikettah
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuuiket
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kuˊiketteen
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kuuiketvettee
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kuˊikettává
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kuˊikettep
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kuuiketvetteđ
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kuˊiketteh
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kuˊikettim
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kuˊikettih
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kuˊikettij
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [kuˊikettáim, kuˊikettááid]
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [kuˊikettáid, kuˊikettááid]
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [kuˊikettáin, kuˊikettááin]
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kuˊikettijm
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kuˊikettijd
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kuˊikettii
    kuikettiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: kuˊikettiččim
    kuikettiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: kuˊikettiččih
    kuikettiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: kuˊikettičij
    kuikettiđ+V+Cond+Du1: [kuˊikettiččijm, kuˊikettiččiijm]
    kuikettiđ+V+Cond+Du2: [kuˊikettiččijd, kuˊikettiččiijd]
    kuikettiđ+V+Cond+Du3: [kuˊikettiččijn, kuˊikettiččiijn]
    kuikettiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: kuˊikettiččijm
    kuikettiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: kuˊikettiččijd
    kuikettiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: kuˊikettiččii
    kuikettiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: kuˊikettižžeem
    kuikettiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: kuˊikettižžeeh
    kuikettiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: kuˊikettiš
    kuikettiđ+V+Pot+Du1: kuˊikettižžeen
    kuikettiđ+V+Pot+Du2: kuˊikettišvettee
    kuikettiđ+V+Pot+Du3: kuˊikettižává
    kuikettiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: kuˊikettižžep
    kuikettiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: kuˊikettišvetteđ
    kuikettiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: kuˊikettižeh
    kuikettiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: kuˊikettum
    kuikettiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kuuiket
    kuikettiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kuˊikettus
    kuikettiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kuˊikettee
    kuikettiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kuˊikettoon
    kuikettiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kuˊikettus
    kuikettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kuˊikettop
    kuikettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kuˊikettiđ
    kuikettiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kuˊikettus
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kuuiket
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kuˊikettâm
    kuikettiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: kuˊikettiččii
    kuikettiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: kuˊikettižžii
    kuikettiđ+V+PrsPrc: [kuˊiketteijee, kuˊikettijee]
    kuikettiđ+V+PrfPrc: kuˊikettâm
    kuikettiđ+V+Actio: kuˊikettem
    kuikettiđ+V+Actio+Ess: kuuiketmin
    kuikettiđ+V+Actio+Loc: kuuiketmist
    kuikettiđ+V+Actio+Ill: kuuiketmân
    kuikettiđ+V+Ger: kuuiketdijn
    kuikettiđ+V+VAbess: kuuikethánnáá
    
